Missouri, session 2026, SB1603.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 442, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
seven new sections, to be known as sections 442.621, 442.626,
442.631, 442.636, 442.641, 442.646, and 442.650, to read as
follows:
442.621. Sections 442.621 to 442.646 shall be known
and may be cited as the "Missouri Declaration and Bylaws
Modernization Act".
442.626. 1. Sections 442.621 to 442.650 shall apply
to all planned communities and all events and circumstances
related to such planned communities occurring on and after
January 1, 2027.
2. Sections 442.621 to 442.650 shall not be construed
to invalidate existing provisions of the declaration,
bylaws, articles of incorporation, or plats of such planned
communities.
442.631. As used in sections 442.621 to 442.650, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Assessment", the sum attributable to each lot and
due to the association based upon the lot's common expense

SB 1603 2
liability or other moneys owed to the association under the
governing documents of the association.
(2) "Association", the lot owners' association;
(3) "Board of directors", the governing body,
regardless of name, that has the power to act on behalf of
the association as designated in the governing documents;
(4) "Bylaws", the written instruments, however
denominated, that contain the procedures for conduct of the
affairs of the association, regardless of the form in which
the association is organized, including any amendments to
the instrument;
(5) "Common ground", any real property, other than a
lot, that is within a planned community and that is owned or
leased by the association;
(6) "Declarant", a person or group of persons acting
in concert that:
(a) As part of a common promotional plan, offers to
dispose of the interest of the person or group of persons in
a lot not previously disposed of; or
(b) Reserves or succeeds to any declarant right;
(7) "Declaration", the instrument, however
denominated, that creates a planned community, including any
amendments to that instrument;
(8) "Governing documents", the declaration, articles
of incorporation, bylaws, and rules and regulations of the
association;
(9) "Lot", a physical portion of the planned community
designated for separate ownership or occupancy as depicted
on the plats of the planned community or as more
particularly described in a declaration;
(10) "Planned community", real property described in a
declaration that sets forth the duties and obligations of

SB 1603 3
the association and lot owners. For the purposes of
sections 442.621 to 442.650, no cooperative, timeshare, or
condominium is a planned community, except that a
cooperative, timeshare, or condominium may be part of a
planned community, or a declaration may expressly provide
that a cooperative, timeshare, or condominium shall be a
planned community subject to sections 442.621 to 442.650.
442.636. 1. The declaration and bylaws of an
association may be amended, provided that there is a simple
majority vote in favor of such amendment. Within ninety
days of distribution of a proposed amendment to a
declaration or bylaw, if an insufficient number of votes are
obtained to decide the question, the declaration or bylaw
may be amended if the association provides a notice to all
members containing a statement that the proposed amendment
would be deemed approved by the members unless one-quarter
of the votes of members in the association submit a vote to
reject the proposed amendment within sixty days of the date
of the notice with a copy of the proposed amendment.
2. The board of directors is authorized to amend the
declaration or bylaws without a vote of the members to
correct drafting, grammatical, cross reference mistakes, or
other technical errors.
3. No action to challenge the validity of an amendment
to the declaration may be brought more than one year after
the amendment to the declaration is recorded. No action to
challenge the validity of the amendment to the bylaws may be
brought more than six months after adoption of an amendment
to the bylaws.
4. If an association does not have separate adopted
bylaws, but such provisions are contained in a declaration,
the amendment process of the declaration shall govern, and

SB 1603 4
all provisions of the declaration shall remain valid and
enforceable.
442.641. 1. The board of directors shall adopt an
annual budget proposed for the consideration by the
members. No later than thirty days after the adoption of a
proposed budget, the board of directors shall provide to all
members a copy of the proposed budget including, but not
limited to, any reserves and a statement of the basis upon
which any reserves are calculated and funded.
2. At the same time as the copy of the proposed budget
is provided under this section, the board of directors shall
set a date at least fourteen days after but no later than
thirty days after providing the ratification of the budget.
Unless at such meeting a majority of all lot owners or any
larger number specified in the declaration reject the
budget, the budget shall be deemed ratified regardless of
whether a quorum is present. If a proposed budget is
rejected, the current budget shall continue until lot owners
ratify a subsequent budget.
442.646. No action to challenge an election or
appointment of a member to fill a vacancy to the board shall
be brought more than thirty days from the date of the
election or appointment.
442.650. In the absence of a board of directors, at
least ten percent of the members can call a special meeting
consistent with chapter 355 to conduct an election, and any
quorum requirement shall be suspended. The newly elected
board of directors shall be deemed to be the board of
directors of the association unless suit is filed within
sixty days of the election. In such event, a court of
competent supervision shall appoint a receiver with

SB 1603 5
experience in management of an association during the
pendency of the case.
✓